Massachusetts, session 194th, S1056.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 39 of chapter 265 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended, in line 2, by striking out the words “of a person” and
inserting in place thereof the following words:- “of another”
SECTION 2. Said section 39 of chapter 265 is hereby further amended, in line 3, by
striking out the words “such person” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- “a
person.”
SECTION 3. Said section 39 of said chapter 265 is hereby further amended by inserting
at the end thereof the following paragraph:-
“If restitution is ordered under the provisions of this section for purposes of repairing the
damage done to the real or personal property with intent to intimidate a person because of such
of 2

person’s race, color, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, or disability,
such restitution shall be used to repair the damage done to the property.”
of 2